California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(v) The fee for an application for the law and ethics examination shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 43.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1724.5.

The amount of fees payable in connection with permits issued under Section 1701.5 is as follows:

(a) The initial permit fee is an amount equal to the renewal fee for the applicant’s license to practice dentistry in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued, except that, if the permit will expire less than one year after its issuance, then the initial permit fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued.

(b) The renewal and delinquency fees shall be fixed by the board at not more than the then current amount of the renewal fee for a license to practice dentistry nor less than five dollars ($5).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 515, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1725.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter that relate to the licensing and permitting of dental assistants shall be established by regulation and subject to the following limitations:

(a) The application fee for an original license shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

(b) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental assistant shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.

(c) The fee for application and for the issuance of an orthodontic assistant permit or a dental sedation assistant permit shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

(d) The fee for the written examination for an orthodontic assistant permit or a dental sedation assistant permit shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.

(e) The fee for the Registered Dental Assistant Combined Written and Law and Ethics Examination for a registered dental assistant shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.

(f) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental assistant in extended functions shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.

(g) The biennial renewal fee for a registered dental assistant license, registered dental assistant in extended functions license, dental sedation
 assistant permit, or orthodontic assistant permit shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

(h) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee for the license or permit in effect on the date of the renewal of the license or permit.

(i) The fee for issuance of a duplicate registration, license, permit, or certificate to replace one that is lost or destroyed, or in the event of a name change, shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(j) The fee for each curriculum review and site evaluation for educational programs for registered dental assistants that are not accredited by a board-approved agency, or the Chancellor’s office of the California Community Colleges shall not exceed seven thousand five
 hundred dollars ($7,500).

(k) The fee for review of each approval application or reevaluation for a course that is not accredited by a board-approved agency or the Chancellor’s office of the California Community Colleges shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(l) Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Dentistry Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 48.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Dental Auxiliaries [1740. - 1777.]

1740.

It is the intention of the Legislature by enactment of this article to permit the full utilization of dental assistants in order to meet the dental care needs of all the state’s citizens. The Legislature further intends that the classifications of dental assistants established by this article permit the continual advancement of persons to successively higher levels of licensure with additional education and training. The Legislature further intends that the Dental Board of California, in implementing this article, consider the recommendations of the Dental Assisting Council, established pursuant to Section 1742.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 44.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.

As used in this article:

(a) “Alternative dental assisting program” means a program offered by an institution of secondary or postsecondary education that has a current accreditation from the Commission on Dental Accreditation or is accredited or approved by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education or State Department of Education, including career health and technical education programs, regional occupation centers or programs, or apprenticeship programs registered by the State Department of Education or Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations in allied dental programs, and whereby a certificate of completion from the program shall serve as a pathway component for licensure as a registered dental
 assistant.

(b) “Basic supportive dental procedures” means procedures that have technically elementary characteristics, are completely reversible, and are unlikely to precipitate potentially hazardous conditions for the patient being treated, including extraoral tasks involving sterilization procedures and infection control and disease prevention tasks.

(c) “Board” means the Dental Board of California.

(d) “Certified dental assistant” means an individual who has successfully passed the general chairside assisting, radiation health and safety, and infection control examinations administered by the Dental Assisting National Board and has an active certification satisfactory to terms and conditions of the Dental Assisting National Board at the time of application for a dental assisting license. A current and valid
 certified dental assistant certificate is not required for subsequent licensure renewals.

(e) “Certificate of completion” means a certificate that shall include, at minimum, the participant’s name, the name of the course or program completed, the name of the course or program provider, including the board-issued approval number, the date or date range of completion of the course or program, the number of completed hours of the course or program, and the signature of the course or program provider, director, administrator, or their designee that verifies the participant has successfully completed any of the following:

(1) A board-approved educational course or program in dental assisting.

(2) A continuing education course provided by a board-approved continuing education provider.

(3) An alternative dental assisting program.

(f) “Continuing education” means a course of study specific to the performance of dental-related procedures where the education is directly related to the clinical and supplemental duties and functions of dental assistants, registered dental assistants, registered dental assistants in extended functions, and dental assisting permitholders, as defined in this article. The continuing education coursework must follow the provisions outlined in board regulations. Continuing education units obtained shall be limited to no more than eight units per day. The following shall apply to the continuing education units:

(1) Live interactive coursework units obtained shall not total more than eight units per day.

(2) Nonlive
 or self-paced online coursework units shall not be more than eight units per day within a range of dates during a seminar, workshop, or educational series where more than one day is required to complete the coursework.

(g) “Coronal polishing” means a procedure limited to the removal of plaque and stain from exposed tooth surfaces.

(h) “Council” means the Dental Assisting Council of the Dental Board of California.

(i) “Course” means an educational offering, class, presentation, meeting, or other similar event.

(j) “Dental assistant” means an individual who, without a license, may perform only basic supportive dental procedures described in Sections 1750 and 1750.1.

(k) “Direct supervision”
 means supervision of dental procedures based on instructions given by a licensed dentist, who shall be physically present in the treatment facility during the performance of those procedures.

(l) “General supervision” means supervision of dental procedures based on instructions given by a licensed dentist but not requiring the physical presence of the supervising dentist during the performance of those procedures.

(m) “Good standing” means the licensee or permitholder has not been disciplined, is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or review procedures, and is not the subject of any unresolved disciplinary proceeding.

(n) “Interim therapeutic restoration” means a direct provisional restoration placed to stabilize the tooth until a licensed dentist diagnoses the need for further definitive treatment. An
 interim therapeutic restoration consists of the removal of soft material from the tooth using only hand instrumentation, without the use of rotary instrumentation, and subsequent placement of an adhesive restorative material. An interim therapeutic restoration may also be applied to a tooth with caries that has been confirmed by the treating dentist to be arrested through the use of a caries arresting agent with or without further removal of tooth structure. Local anesthesia shall not be necessary for interim therapeutic restoration placement.

(o) “Preceptee” means an unlicensed dental assistant who is supervised by a California-licensed dentist or dentists in good standing and is participating in a preceptorship in dental assisting to learn the clinical skills and acquire procedural knowledge through work experience and supplemental dental assisting coursework.

(p) “Preceptor”
 means a California-licensed dentist in good standing who directly supervises and provides on-the-job training to a preceptee in a preceptorship in dental assisting by evaluating clinical competence, documenting completion of clinical chairside work experience, learning, and clinical progress, teaching and promoting clinical reasoning, and ensuring the preceptee has completed course requirements before performing dental assisting duties pursuant to Section 1750.1. A preceptee may have more than one California-licensed dentist serve as a preceptor.

(q) “Preceptorship in dental assisting” means supervised on-the-job training of a preceptee by a preceptor in the performance of duties specified in Section 1750.1 in a competent manner as determined by the preceptor pursuant to the requirements set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1752.1.

(r) “Registered dental
 assistant” means a person licensed by the board to perform all procedures authorized under Section 1752.4.

(s) “Registered dental assistant in extended functions” means a person licensed by the board to perform all procedures authorized under Section 1753.5.

(t) “Satisfactory work experience” means performance of the duties specified in Section 1750.1 in a competent manner as determined by the supervising dentist or dentists, who shall certify under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California the applicant’s completion of the work experience.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 46.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.

(a) There is hereby created a Dental Assisting Council of the Dental Board of California, which shall consider all matters relating to dental assistants in this state, on its own initiative or upon the request of the board, and make appropriate recommendations to the board and the standing committees of the board, including, but not limited to, the following areas:

(1) Requirements for dental assistant examination, licensure, permitting, and renewal.

(2) Standards and criteria for approval of dental assisting educational programs, courses, and continuing education.

(3) Allowable dental assistant duties, settings, and supervision
 levels.

(4) Appropriate standards of conduct and enforcement for dental assistants.

(5) Requirements regarding infection control.

(b) (1) The members of the council shall be appointed by the board and shall include the registered dental assistant member of the board, another member of the board, and five registered dental assistants, representing as broad a range of dental assisting experience and education as possible, who meet the requirements of paragraph (2).

(2) The board shall consider, in its appointments of the five registered dental assistant members, recommendations submitted by any incorporated, nonprofit
 professional society, association, or entity whose membership is comprised of registered dental assistants within the state. Two of those members shall be employed as faculty members of a registered dental assisting educational program approved by the board, and shall have been so employed for at least the prior five years. Three of those members, which shall include one registered dental assistant in extended functions, shall be employed clinically in private dental practice or public safety net or dental health care clinics. All five of those members shall have possessed a current and active registered dental assistant or registered dental assistant in extended functions license for at least the prior five years, and shall not be employed by a current member of the board.

(c) No council appointee shall have served previously on the dental
 assisting forum or have any financial interest in any registered dental assistant school. All final candidate qualifications and applications for board-appointed council members shall be made available in the published board materials with final candidate selection conducted during the normal business of the board during public meetings.

(d) A vacancy occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment by the board for the unexpired term, according to the criteria applicable to the vacancy within 90 days after it occurs.

(e) Each member shall comply with conflict of interest requirements that apply to board members.

(f) The council may meet in conjunction with other board committees, and at other times as deemed
 necessary.

(g) Each member shall serve for a term of four years, except that, of the initial appointments of the nonboard members, one of the members shall serve a term of one year, one member shall serve a term of two years, two members shall serve a term of three years, and one member shall serve a term of four years, as determined by the board. No member shall serve more than two full terms.

(h) Recommendations by the council pursuant to this section shall be approved, modified, or rejected by the board within 120 days of submission of the recommendation to the board during full board business. In the event the board rejects, postpones, refers the matter back to the council for any reason, or significantly modifies the intent or scope of the recommendation, the board
 shall provide its reasons in writing for rejecting or significantly modifying the recommendation, which shall be provided by the board within 30 days.

(i) The council shall select a chair who shall establish the agendas of the council and shall serve as the council’s liaison to the board, including the reporting of the council’s recommendations to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 50.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1743.

(a) The board shall have the following duties and authority related to applications:

(1) Shall review and evaluate all applications for licensure in all dental assisting categories to ascertain whether a candidate meets the appropriate licensing requirements specified by statute and board regulations.

(2) Shall maintain application records, cashier application fees, and perform any other ministerial tasks as are incidental to the application process.

(3) May delegate any or all of the functions in this subdivision to its staff.

(4) Shall issue dental assistant licenses in all cases, except where there is a question as to a licensing requirement.

(b) The board shall develop or cause to be developed and administer examinations. The board shall set pass points for all dental assisting licensing examinations.

(c) The board shall be responsible for all aspects of the license renewal process, which shall be accomplished in accordance with this chapter and board regulations. The board may delegate any or all of its functions under this subdivision to its staff.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1747.

The procedure on all matters relating to the denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses granted under this article shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 872.)
-------------------------------------------

1750.

(a) A dental assistant is an individual who, without a license, may perform basic supportive dental procedures, as authorized by Section 1750.1 and by regulations adopted by the board, under the supervision of a licensed dentist. “Basic supportive dental procedures” are those procedures that have technically elementary characteristics, are completely reversible, and are unlikely to precipitate potentially hazardous conditions for the patient being treated.

(b) The supervising licensed dentist shall be directly responsible for determining the competency of the dental assistant to perform the basic supportive dental procedures, as authorized by Section 1750.1.

(c) The employer of a dental assistant shall be responsible for ensuring that the dental assistant has successfully completed an infection control course or examination in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1755 prior to performing any basic supportive dental procedures involving potential exposure to blood, saliva, or other potentially infectious materials.

(d) The employer shall maintain evidence for the length of the employment for the dental assistant at the supervising dentist’s treatment facility to verify the dental assistant has met and maintained all certification requirements as dictated by statute and regulation.

(e) The employer shall inform the dental assistant of the educational requirements
 described in subdivision (f) to maintain employment as an unlicensed dental assistant.

(f) The employer of a dental assistant shall be responsible for ensuring that the dental assistant who has been employed continuously or on an intermittent basis by that employer for one year from the date of first employment provides evidence to the employer that the dental assistant has already successfully completed, or successfully completes, all of the following within one year of the first date of employment:

(1) A board-approved two-hour course in the Dental Practice Act.

(2) Current certification in basic life support issued by the American Red Cross, the American Heart Association, the American Safety and Health Institute,
 the American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or the Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education, in accordance with both of the following:

(A) The dental assistant shall be responsible for maintaining current certification in basic life support to perform duties involving patients.

(B) The employer of a dental assistant shall be responsible for ensuring that the dental assistant maintains certification in basic life support.

(3) To perform radiographic procedures, a dental assistant shall complete a board-approved course in radiation safety. The original or a copy of the current, valid certificate issued by a board-approved radiation safety course provider
 shall be publicly displayed at the treatment facility where the dental assistant performs dental services.

(4) To perform coronal polishing prior to licensure as a registered dental assistant, an unlicensed dental assistant shall complete a board-approved coronal polishing course and obtain a certificate of completion. Prior to taking the coronal polishing course, the dental assistant shall provide evidence to the course provider of having completed a board-approved eight-hour course in infection control and a current, valid certification in basic life support.

(A) Coronal polishing performed pursuant to this paragraph shall be performed under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist, who
 shall, at minimum, evaluate each patient after coronal polishing procedures are performed by the dental assistant.

(B) The original or a copy of the current, valid certificate issued by a board-approved coronal polishing course provider shall be publicly displayed at the treatment facility where the dental assistant performs dental services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   (SB 1311)   Effective September 14, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1750.1.

(a) A dental assistant may perform the following duties under the general supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:

(1) Extraoral duties specified by the supervising licensee that meet the definition of a basic supportive dental procedure specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1741. These duties may include a procedure that requires the use of personal protective equipment, laboratory functions, and sterilization and disinfection procedures described in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 5193 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. 

(2) Operate dental radiography equipment for the
 purpose of oral radiography if the dental assistant has complied with the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 1750.

(3) Perform intraoral and extraoral photography.

(b) A dental assistant may perform the following duties under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:

(1) Apply nonaerosol and noncaustic topical agents, including all forms of topical fluoride.

(2) Take intraoral impressions for all nonprosthodontic appliances.

(3) Take facebow transfers and bite registrations.

(4) Place and remove rubber dams or other isolation
 devices.

(5) Place, wedge, and remove matrices for restorative procedures.

(6) Remove postextraction dressings after inspection of the surgical site by the supervising licensed dentist.

(7) Perform measurements for the purposes of orthodontic treatment.

(8) Cure dental materials with a light curing device.

(9) Examine orthodontic appliances.

(10) Place and remove orthodontic separators.

(11) Remove ligature ties and archwires.

(12) After adjustment by the dentist, examine and seat removable
 orthodontic appliances and deliver care instructions to the patient.

(13) Remove periodontal dressings.

(14) Remove sutures after inspection of the site by the dentist.

(15) Place patient monitoring sensors.

(16) Adjust the flow of nitrous oxide and oxygen gases if deemed necessary and directed by the supervising dentist who shall be present in the operatory directly supervising the adjustment.

(17) Extraoral functions specified by the supervising dentist that meet the definition of basic supportive dental procedures specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1741. Such duties may include patient monitoring, placing monitoring sensors, taking of vital signs, or other extraoral procedures
 related to the scope of their practice.

(18) In response to a medical emergency and under the direct supervision, order, control, and full professional responsibility of the licensed dentist, a dental assistant may administer or assist in the administration of oxygen. 

(c) The board may specify additional allowable duties by regulation.

(d) The duties of a dental assistant or a dental assistant holding a permit in orthodontic assisting or in dental sedation shall not include any of the following procedures unless specifically allowed by law:

(1) Diagnosis and comprehensive treatment planning.

(2) Placing, finishing, or removing permanent restorations.

(3) Surgery or cutting on hard and soft tissue including, but not limited to, the removal of teeth and the cutting and suturing of soft tissue.

(4) Prescribing medication.

(5) Starting the flow of nitrous oxide and oxygen gases.

(6) Administration of local or general anesthesia or sedation.

(e) Unless otherwise permitted in this section, the duties of a dental assistant do not include any duty or procedure that only a registered dental assistant, registered dental assistant in extended functions, orthodontic assistant, dental sedation assistant, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental hygienist in alternative practice is allowed to perform.

(f) The placement of pit and fissure sealants may only be performed by a registered dental assistant, registered dental assistant in extended functions, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental hygienist in alternative practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 49.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1750.2.

(a) The board may issue an orthodontic assistant permit to a person who files a completed application, pays the applicable fee, and provides evidence, satisfactory to the board, of the following eligibility requirements: 

(1) Successful completion, within two years before the date the application is received by the board, of a two-hour board-approved course in the Dental Practice Act and an eight-hour board-approved course in infection control, and, within five years before the date the application is received by the board, of a board-approved course in ultrasonic scaling.

(2) Current certification in basic life support issued by American Red Cross, American Heart Association, American Safety and
 Health Institute, American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education.

(3) Successful completion of a board-approved orthodontic assistant course.

(4) A full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting a criminal history record check.

(5) Passage of a written examination administered by the board after completion of all of the other requirements of this subdivision. The written examination shall encompass the knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary to competently perform the duties specified in Section 1750.3.

(b) A person who holds a permit pursuant to this section shall be responsible for obtaining recertification in basic life support as part of
 permit renewal and completing the continuing education requirements as established by the board pursuant to Section 1645 and the renewal requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 1715).

(c) The original or a copy of the current, valid permit issued by the board shall be publicly displayed at the treatment facility where the permitholder performs dental services.

(d) Preparation or execution of false documentation of satisfaction of any requirement under this section shall be considered unprofessional conduct and grounds for license denial, revocation, or suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 50.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1750.3.

(a) A person holding an orthodontic assistant permit pursuant to Section 1750.2 may perform under the general supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist all duties that a dental assistant is allowed to perform under subdivision (a) of Section 1750.1, and the following duties under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:

(1) All duties that a dental assistant is allowed to perform under subdivision (b) of Section 1750.1.

(2) Isolate, condition, etch, and prepare teeth for provisional attachments, bonded attachments,
 aligner buttons, aligner connections, orthodontic brackets, and appliances.

(3) Size, fit, and secure orthodontic bands using appropriate materials.

(4) Prepare teeth for bonding and select, preposition, and cure orthodontic brackets after their position has been approved by the supervising licensed dentist.

(5) Remove orthodontic bands, brackets, and attachments and remove excess cement from supragingival surfaces of teeth with a hand instrument, with the removal of any remaining material by the supervising licensed dentist or registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010.

(6) Place and ligate archwires.

(7) Remove excess cement with an ultrasonic
 scaler from supragingival surfaces of teeth undergoing orthodontic treatment.

(8) Any additional duties that the board may prescribe by regulation.

(b) The original or a copy of the current, valid permit issued by the board shall be publicly displayed at the treatment facility where the permitholder performs dental services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 51.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1750.4.

(a) The board may issue a dental sedation assistant permit to a person who files a completed application, pays the applicable fee, and provides evidence, satisfactory to the board, of all of the following eligibility requirements:

(1) Current, active, and valid licensure as a registered dental assistant or registered dental assistant in extended functions, or completion of at least 12 months of verifiable work experience as a dental assistant.

(2) Successful completion, within two years before the date the application is received by the board, of a two-hour board-approved course in the Dental Practice Act and an eight-hour board-approved course in infection control.

(3) Current certification in basic life support issued by American Red Cross, American Heart Association, American Safety and Health Institute, American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education. 

(4) Successful completion of a board-approved dental sedation assistant course, which may commence after the completion of six months of work experience as a dental assistant.

(5) A full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting a criminal history record check. 

(6) Passage of a written examination administered by the board after completion of all of the other requirements of this subdivision. The written examination shall encompass the knowledge, skills, and
 abilities necessary to competently perform the duties specified in Section 1750.5.

(b) A person who holds a permit pursuant to this section shall be responsible for obtaining recertification in basic life support as part of permit renewal and completing the same continuing education requirements as established by the board pursuant to Section 1645 and the renewal requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 1715).

(c) The original or a copy of the current, valid permit issued by the board shall be publicly displayed at the treatment facility where the permitholder performs dental services.

(d) Preparation or execution of false documentation of satisfaction of any requirement under this section shall be considered unprofessional conduct and grounds for license denial, revocation, or
 suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 52.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1750.5.

(a) A person who holds a dental sedation assistant permit pursuant to Section 1750.4 may perform under general supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist all duties that a dental assistant is allowed to perform under subdivision (a) of Section 1750.1 and the following duties under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a current, valid licensed dentist or other licensed health care professional authorized to administer moderate sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia in the treatment facility: 

(1) All duties that a dental assistant is allowed to perform under subdivision (b) of Section 1750.1.

(2) Monitor patients undergoing moderate sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia utilizing data from noninvasive instrumentation such as pulse oximeters, electrocardiograms, capnography, blood pressure, pulse, and respiration rate monitoring devices. Evaluation of the condition of a sedated patient shall remain the responsibility of the supervising dentist or the licensed health care professional authorized to administer moderate sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia, who shall be at the patient’s chairside while moderate sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia is being administered.

(3) Drug identification and draw, limited to identification of appropriate medications, ampule and vial preparation, and withdrawing drugs of correct amount as verified by the supervising licensed dentist, or the licensed health care professional authorized to administer moderate
 sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia.

(4) Add drugs, medications, and fluids to intravenous lines using a syringe, provided that a supervising licensed dentist is present at the patient’s chairside, limited to determining patency of intravenous line, selection of injection port, syringe insertion into injection port, occlusion of intravenous line and blood aspiration, line release, and injection of drugs for appropriate time interval. The exception to this duty is that the initial dose of a drug or medication shall be administered by the supervising licensed dentist or licensed health care professional authorized to administer moderate sedation, deep sedation, or general anesthesia.

(5) Removal of intravenous lines.

(6) Any additional duties that the board may prescribe by regulation.

(b) The duties listed in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) may not be performed in any setting other than a dental office or dental clinic.

(c) The original or a copy of the current, valid permit issued by the board shall be publicly displayed at the treatment facility where the permitholder performs dental services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 53.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1751.

At least once every seven years, the board shall review the allowable duties for dental assistants, registered dental assistants, registered dental assistants in extended functions, dental sedation assistant permitholders, and orthodontic assistant permitholders, the supervision level for these categories, and the settings under which these duties may be performed, and shall update the regulations as necessary to keep them current with the state of the dental practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 19.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.1.

(a) The board may license as a registered dental assistant a person who files an application, pays the applicable fee, and submits written evidence, satisfactory to the board, of one of the following eligibility requirements:

(1) Graduation from an educational program in registered dental assisting approved by the board.

(2) Completion of satisfactory work experience performing the duties of a dental assistant, as defined in Section 1750.1, which includes at least 15 months and a minimum of 1,280 hours before the submission of the application.

(3) Current, valid certification as a certified dental assistant, as issued
 by the Dental Assisting National Board.

(4) Completion of an alternative dental assisting program as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1741 that includes all the following:

(A) At least 500 hours of didactic and laboratory coursework in dental assisting-related topics that shall encompass all aspects of clinical chairside assisting, including, but not limited to, medical and dental emergencies, first aid and safety precautions, protocols and armamentaria associated with a variety of dental assisting chairside procedures, dental materials, and skill development courses associated with operative and specialty dentistry and that include education as specified in subdivision (c).

(B) At least 300 hours of clinical chairside work experience, involving the allowable duties described in Section 1750.1, directly
 supervised, evaluated, and documented by a supervising licensed dentist.

(5) Completion of a preceptorship in dental assisting that includes all the following:

(A) At least 500 hours of clinical chairside work experience documented on a form furnished by the board, involving allowable duties described in Section 1750.1, directly supervised, evaluated, and documented by a preceptor, who certifies under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California to the applicant’s completion of the clinical chairside work experience. Clinical work experience that meets the eligibility requirements of this term performed as a dental assistant within the two years immediately preceding the effective date of this section may be used to satisfy this requirement.

(B) At least 300 hours documented on a form furnished by the
 board of coursework in dental assisting-related topics, inclusive of the education required in subdivision (c), which may be obtained concurrent to the work experience and satisfies all the following:

(i) The coursework shall include education defined in subdivision (c) and encompass all aspects of clinical chairside assisting, including, but not limited to, medical and dental emergencies, first aid and safety precautions, protocols and armamentaria associated with a variety of dental assisting chairside procedures, dental materials, and skill development courses associated with operative and specialty dentistry.

(ii) Courses shall be obtained through a board-approved dental assisting educational program or course provider, a board-registered provider of continuing education courses, the American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or a provider approved
 by the Academy of General Dentistry Program Approval for Continuing Education.

(iii) The preceptee’s completion of the coursework shall be verified by the preceptor, who shall certify under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California verification of the preceptee’s completion of the required coursework.

(b) The board shall give credit toward the work experience referred to in this section to persons who have graduated from a dental assisting program in a postsecondary institution approved by the Department of Education or in a secondary institution, regional occupational center, or regional occupational program, that are not, however, approved by the board pursuant to subdivision (a). The credit shall equal the total weeks spent in classroom training and internship on a week-for-week basis. The board, in cooperation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction,